Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201271-6218
Regulated health
professions, defined.

Regulated health professions
shall mean those persons or groups who are currently licensed or otherwise
regulated under the Uniform Credentialing Act, who are qualified by training,
education, or experience to perform the functions prescribed in this section,
and whose principal functions, customarily performed for remuneration, are
to render services directly or indirectly to individuals for the purpose of:

(1) Preventing physical, mental, or emotional injury or illness;

(2) Facilitating recovery from injury or illness;

(3) Providing rehabilitative or continuing care following
injury or illness; or

(4) Providing
any other health service, health-related service, or environmental service
which may be subject to regulation by the division.

Laws 1985, LB 407, § 18;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1242;

Laws 2012, LB834, § 15.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.